Utah statutes.
17-32-2.   Collection of fines by bail commissioners -- Disposition.

(1)  In addition to the duty of fixing bail, a bail commissioner shall have power to collect and receipt money tendered in payment of the fine of a person serving sentence in default of the payment of the fine when the court is closed.

(2)  Money collected by a bail  commissioner shall be delivered to the court that issued the commitment order within three days of receipt of the money.



Amended by Chapter 283, 1990 General Session

